District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.28

Pending actions and proceedings; existing orders.

(a)

No judicial or administrative proceeding commenced by or against any emergency medical services agency, emergency medical response vehicle owner or operator, emergency medical services training facility or instructor, emergency medical technician, or paramedic shall abate by reason of the taking effect of this chapter. Each such action or proceeding shall be continued with substitution as to parties and government agencies as appropriate.

(b)

All decisions issued pursuant to the Ambulance and Medical Personnel Regulation (29 DCMR § 500 et seq.) shall continue in effect until modified, rescinded, or superseded by regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 29, 56 DCR 1167